src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/N-Prop-Oct_2016_gt-desc.yaml
      Fiat+N+Prop+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: Fiatidessegi
      Fiat+N+Prop+Pl+Com: Fiatidega
      Fiat+N+Prop+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: Fiatidegagi
      Fiat+N+Prop+Pl+Abe: Fiatideta
      Fiat+N+Prop+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: Fiatidetagi
      Fiat+N+Prop+Pl+Ess: Fiatidena
      Fiat+N+Prop+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: Fiatidenagi
      Fiat+N+Prop+Pl+Trm: Fiatideni
      Fiat+N+Prop+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: Fiatidenigi
      Fiat+N+Prop+Pl+Tra: Fiatideks
      Fiat+N+Prop+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: Fiatidekski
      Fiat+N+Prop+Pl+Abl: Fiatidelt
      Fiat+N+Prop+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: Fiatideltki
      Fiat+N+Prop+Pl+Ade: Fiatidel
      Fiat+N+Prop+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: Fiatidelgi
      Fiat+N+Prop+Pl+All: Fiatidele
      Fiat+N+Prop+Pl+All+Foc/gi: Fiatidelegi
      Fiat+N+Prop+Pl+Ela: Fiatidest
      Fiat+N+Prop+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: Fiatidestki
      Fiat+N+Prop+Pl+Ine: Fiatides
      Fiat+N+Prop+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: Fiatideski
      Fiat+N+Prop+Pl+Gen: Fiatide
      Fiat+N+Prop+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: Fiatidegi
